Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1837
Civil service; employees; salaries; compliance with act.

No treasurer, auditor, comptroller, or other officer or employee of any municipality subject to the Civil Service Act shall approve the payment of or be in any manner concerned in paying, auditing, or approving any salary, wage, or other compensation for services to any person subject to the jurisdiction and scope of the Civil Service Act unless the person to receive such salary, wage, or other compensation has been appointed or employed in compliance with such act.

Laws 1943, c. 29, § 12, p. 135;

R.S.1943, § 19-1812;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 19-1812;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 16.